Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-210
Drains or ditches; failure of mutual agreement; right of eminent domain; procedure.

If the appraisers shall for any reason fail to procure the right-of-way for the proposed ditch or ditches, drain or drains, from any of the owners of the land crossed thereby, by a mutual agreement with such owners, the county board may acquire same by the exercise of the power of eminent domain. The procedure to condemn property shall be exercised in the manner set forth in sections 76-704 to 76-724.

Laws 1911, c. 142, § 9, p. 469;

R.S.1913, § 1780;

C.S.1922, § 1727;

C.S.1929, § 31-310;

R.S.1943, § 31-210;

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 71, p. 479;

Laws 1961, c. 138, § 2, p. 396.